Washington statutes.
RCW 4.44.080

Questions of law to be decided by court.

All questions of law including the admissibility of testimony, the facts preliminary to such admission, and the construction of statutes and other writings, and other rules of evidence, are to be decided by the court, and all discussions of law addressed to it.

[Code 1881 s 223; 1877 p 47 s 227; 1869 p 56 s 227; RRS s 342.]

NOTES:

Rules of court: Cf. ER 104 and ER 1008.